Florida, session 2026, HB415.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present subsection (29) of section 1001.42,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb415-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 415 2026
Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (30), and a new
subsection (29) is added to that section, to read:
1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
powers and perform all duties listed below:
(29) TITLE VI COORDINATOR.—
(a) Each district school board shall designate a Title VI
coordinator. The coordinator shall:
1. Have expertise in and oversee compliance with Title VI
of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and compliance with s. 1000.05.
2. Promote equal access to and participation in the
programs and activities of schools within the school district.
3. Provide training and educational resources regarding
Title VI law and regulations, including, at a minimum, those who
are responsible for receiving reports on potential Title VI
complaints.
4. Maintain records and reports related to Title VI
compliance, including a summary of the allegations, the
complainant's protected category, the disposition of the
complaint, and the corrective actions taken, so that the Title
VI coordinator can assess compliance.
5. Provide advice and consultation on supportive and
corrective measures.
6. Perform any other relevant duty established by the
school district.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb415-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 415 2026
(b)1. A person alleging discrimination in violation of
Title VI may file a complaint with the district school
superintendent or the Title VI coordinator of the school
district.
2. A parent or guardian may submit a complaint on behalf
of his or her minor child.
(c) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to
implement this subsection.
Section 2. Section 1004.041, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1004.041 Title VI coordinator.—
(1) Each Florida College System institution and state
university shall designate a Title VI coordinator. The
coordinator shall:
(a) Have expertise in and oversee compliance with Title VI
of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and compliance with s. 1000.05.
(b) Promote equal access to and participation in the
programs and activities of the institution.
(c) Provide training and educational resources regarding
Title VI law and regulations, including, at a minimum, those who
are responsible for receiving reports on potential Title VI
complaints.
(d) Maintain records and reports related to Title VI
compliance, including a summary of the allegations, the
complainant's protected category, the disposition of the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb415-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 415 2026
complaint, and the corrective actions taken, so that the Title
VI coordinator can assess compliance.
(e) Provide advice and consultation on supportive and
corrective measures.
(f) Perform any other relevant duty established by the
institution.
(2)(a) A person alleging discrimination in violation of
Title VI may file a complaint with the institution's dean of
students or Title VI coordinator.
(b) A parent or guardian may submit a complaint on behalf
of his or her minor child.
(3) The State Board of Education and Board of Governors
shall adopt rules and regulations, respectively, to implement
this section.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb415-00